Hawaii statutes.
§651-42 How levy made, inventory.
Every levy by an officer, in pursuance of a writ of execution issued by any
court or judge, shall be made by taking the property levied upon into the
officer's possession, care, and guardianship, and at the officer's option, by
removal of the same to some place of security. The officer shall make an
inventory of the property levied upon. [CC 1859, §1022; RL 1925, §2446; RL
1935, §4145; RL 1945, §10172; RL 1955, §233-41; HRS §651-42; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Marshal read execution to defendant but did not take any
property into custody or make an inventory, held no levy. 6 H. 153 (1875).

Judgment cannot be levied upon. 16 H. 106 (1904).

Notice of money award not proper subject for garnishment. 16
H. 106 (1904).

Valid levy on growing crops. 21 H. 745 (1913).

Sale of leasehold interest in pond. 22 H. 665 (1915).

Chose in action not subject to levy and sale upon execution.
26 H. 699 (1923).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next